Massachusetts, session 194th, H1716.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28 of Chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:— No court shall make
an order providing unsupervised visitation rights to a parent who has been convicted of sexual
abuse and/or other crimes against children including but not limited to one or more of the
following: Ch. 265, sections 13B, 13H, 13J, 22, 22A, 23, 24, 24B, 26, 26A, 27A, Chapter 272,
sections 1, 2, 4, 4A, 4B, 16, 17, 28, 29A, 29B, 35, 35A, unless such child is of suitable age and
assents to such order and a guardian ad litem finds the visitation is in the best interest of the
child.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 37 of Chapter 209 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:— No court shall make
an order providing unsupervised visitation rights to a parent who has been convicted of sexual
abuse and/or other crimes against children including but not limited to one or more of the
following: Ch. 265, sections 13B, 13H, 13J, 22, 22A, 23, 24, 24B, 26, 26A, 27A, Chapter 272,
sections 1, 2, 4, 4A, 4B, 16, 17, 28, 29A, 29B, 35, 35A, unless such child is of suitable age and
assents to such order and a guardian ad litem finds the visitation is in the best interest of the
child.
of 2